Utah statutes.
53-2b-402.   Benefits in case of injury or death.

An assisting political subdivision shall provide its officers who respond, under this chapter, to an emergency in a requesting political subdivision and who, during the response, are injured or die in the state of the requesting political subdivision with the same death benefits and compensation, including workers' compensation, that the officers would be entitled to if the emergency and response had occurred in the assisting political subdivision.



Amended by Chapter 331, 2013 General Session, (Coordination Clause) 

Enacted by Chapter 331, 2013 General Session

